Illinois, session 104th, SB1826.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 7, and 9.5 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)7    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:8    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 9judicial, administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, or 10their components, state universities and colleges, counties, 11townships, cities, villages, incorporated towns, school 12districts and all other municipal corporations, boards, 13bureaus, committees, or commissions of this State, any 14subsidiary bodies of any of the foregoing including but not 15limited to committees and subcommittees thereof, and a School 16Finance Authority created under Article 1E of the School Code. 17"Public body" does not include a child death review team or the 18Illinois Child Death Review Teams Executive Council 19established under the Child Death Review Team Act, or a 20regional youth advisory board or the Statewide Youth Advisory 21Board established under the Department of Children and Family 22Services Statewide Youth Advisory Board Act.23    (b) "Person" means any individual, corporation,   SB1826- 2 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1partnership, firm, organization or association, acting 2individually or as a group.3    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 4writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 5photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 6data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 7information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 8the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 9form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 10having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 11of, or under the control of any public body. For the judicial 12body and its components, "public records" includes, but is not 13limited to, the following records in possession of the 14judicial body or its components, as long as the record has been 15anonymized and all personally identifiable information, 16including, but not limited to, personally identifiable 17information of a juvenile, such as the juvenile's name and 18date of birth, has been anonymized: juvenile court and 19juvenile detention information; criminal charges; detention 20date; release date; reason for detention; orders for pretrial 21services; orders for electronic monitoring and case 22disposition; and contracts related to pretrial or post 23adjudication services, programs, or monitoring and any 24finalized reports or evaluations of those programs. 25    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 26including a person's social security number, driver's license   SB1826- 3 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 2personal financial information, passwords or other access 3codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 4and personal email addresses. Private information also 5includes home address and personal license plates, except as 6otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 7of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 8HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 9electronic medical records and all information, including 10demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 11electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 12the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 13privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, 14the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 15its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 16subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 17the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.18    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 19public record or records, or information derived from public 20records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 21advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 22definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 23scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 24to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal 25purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 26information concerning news and current or passing events,   SB1826- 4 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 2public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 3public research or education.4    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 5by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 6process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 7available to the public body.8    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 9chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 10manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 11executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 12such person's duly authorized designee.13    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical 14issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 15format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 16a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 17community antenna television service, or a person or 18corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 19picture news for public showing.20    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 21Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 22preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 23(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 24requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a 25minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 26purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and   SB1826- 5 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 2considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 3time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 4the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 5concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 6articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 7(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 8research or education.9    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 10written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 11to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 12personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 13means available to the public body and that identifies the 14particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 15identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 16    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 17includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 18different categories of records or a combination of individual 19requests that total requests for more than 5 different 20categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 21requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 22legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 23record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 24include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail, 25letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.26    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by   SB1826- 6 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 2organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 3to access and disseminate information concerning news and 4current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 5features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 6academic, scientific, or public research or education.7    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 8written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 9to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 10personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 11means available to the public body and that identifies the 12particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 13request may identify multiple individual records to be 14inspected or copied. 15    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 16any public body and its employee for the employee's 17resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 18(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.) 19    (5 ILCS 140/7)20    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 103-865)21    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 22    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 23record that contains information that is exempt from 24disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 25that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect   SB1826- 7 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 2shall make the remaining information available for inspection 3and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 4be exempt from inspection and copying: 5        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 6    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 7    regulations implementing federal or State law. 8        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 9    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 10    or a court order. 11        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 12    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 13    specifically designed to provide information to one or 14    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 15    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 16        (c) Personal information contained within public 17    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 18    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 19    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 20    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 21    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 22    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 23    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 24    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 25    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 26    that bears on the public duties of public employees and   SB1826- 8 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 2    privacy. 3        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 4    created in the course of administrative enforcement 5    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 6    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 7    extent that disclosure would: 8            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 9        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 10        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 11        agency that is the recipient of the request; 12            (ii) interfere with active administrative 13        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 14        that is the recipient of the request; 15            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 16        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 17        hearing; 18            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 19        confidential source, confidential information 20        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 21        who file complaints with or provide information to 22        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 23        penal agencies; except that the identities of 24        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 25        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 26        local government, except when disclosure would   SB1826- 9 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1        interfere with an active criminal investigation 2        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 3        request; 4            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 5        techniques other than those generally used and known 6        or disclose internal documents of correctional 7        agencies related to detection, observation, or 8        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 9        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 10        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 11        request; 12            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 13        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 14            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 15        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 16        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 17    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 18    record management system if the law enforcement agency 19    that is the recipient of the request did not create the 20    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 21    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 22    access to the record through the shared electronic record 23    management system. 24        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 25    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 26    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that   SB1826- 10 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 2    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 3    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 4    Board. 5        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 6    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 7    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 8        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 9    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 10        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 11    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 12    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 13    materials are available in the library of the correctional 14    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 15    confined. 16        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 17    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 18    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 19    materials include records from staff members' personnel 20    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 21    information. 22        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 23    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 24    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 25    through an administrative request to the Department of 26    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of   SB1826- 11 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    Mental Health. 2        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 3    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 4    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 5    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 6    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 7    institution or facility.8        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 9    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 10    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 11    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 12    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 13    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 14    or school address, work telephone number, social security 15    number, or any other identifying information, except as 16    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 17    or claim. 18        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 19    requested by a person committed to the Department of 20    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 21    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 22    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 23    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 24    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 25    claim. 26        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations,   SB1826- 12 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 2    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 3    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 4    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 5    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 6    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 7    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 8    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 9        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 10    information obtained from a person or business where the 11    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 12    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 13    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 14    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 15    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 16    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 17    requested.18        The information included under this exemption includes 19    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 20    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 21    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 22    company within the investment portfolio of a private 23    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 24    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 25    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 26    to the aggregate financial performance information of a   SB1826- 13 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 2    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 3    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 4    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 5    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 6    privately held company may cause competitive harm.7        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 8    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 9    to disclosure. 10        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 11    agreement, including information which if it were 12    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 13    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 14    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 15    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 16    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 17    award or final selection is made. 18        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 19    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 20    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 21    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 22    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 23    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 24    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 25    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 26    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate   SB1826- 14 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 2    legal rights of the general public. 3        (j) The following information pertaining to 4    educational matters:5            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 6        examination data used to administer an academic 7        examination; 8            (ii) information received by a primary or 9        secondary school, college, or university under its 10        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 11        their academic peers; 12            (iii) information concerning a school or 13        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 14        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 15        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and16            (iv) course materials or research materials used 17        by faculty members. 18        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 19    submissions, and other construction related technical 20    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 21    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 22    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 23    including, but not limited to, power generating and 24    distribution stations and other transmission and 25    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 26    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers,   SB1826- 15 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 2    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 3    security. 4        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 5    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 6    public body makes the minutes available to the public 7    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 8        (m) Communications between a public body and an 9    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 10    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 11    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 12    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 13    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 14    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 15    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 16        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 17    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 18    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 19    cases in which discipline is imposed. 20        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 21    with automated data processing operations, including, but 22    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 23    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 24    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 25    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 26    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other   SB1826- 16 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 2    security of the system or its data or the security of 3    materials exempt under this Section. 4        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 5    between public bodies and their employees or 6    representatives, except that any final contract or 7    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 8        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 9    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 10    an applicant for a license or employment. 11        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 12    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 13    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 14    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 15    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 16    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 17    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 18    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 19    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 20    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 21    until a sale is consummated. 22        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 23    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 24    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 25    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 26    Insurance or self-insurance (including any   SB1826- 17 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    intergovernmental risk management association or 2    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 3    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 4        (t) Information contained in or related to 5    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 6    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 7    for the regulation or supervision of financial 8    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 9    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 10    law. 11        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 12    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 13    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 14    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 15    Electronic Transactions Act. 16        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 17    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 18    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 19    community's population or systems, facilities, or 20    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 21    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 22    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 23    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 24    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 25    include such things as details pertaining to the 26    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to   SB1826- 18 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 2    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 3        (w) (Blank). 4        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 5    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 6    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 7    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 8    Illinois Power Agency. 9        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 10    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 11    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 12    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 13    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 14    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 15    Commission. 16        (z) Information about students exempted from 17    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 18    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 19    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 20    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 21    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 22        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 23    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 24        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 25    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 26    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice   SB1826- 19 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    Mortality Review Team Act. 2        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 3    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 4    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 5    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.6        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 7    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 8    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 9    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 10        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 11    information of persons who are minors and are also 12    participants and registrants in programs of park 13    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 14    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 15    associations.16        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 17    information of participants and registrants in programs of 18    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 19    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 20    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 21    minors.22        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 23    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 24    2012. 25        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 26    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force   SB1826- 20 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 2    School Code and any information contained in that report. 3        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 4    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 5    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 6    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 7    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 8    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 9    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 10    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 11    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 12    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 13    Corrections.14        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 15    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 16        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 17    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 18    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 19    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 20    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 21    of a governmental entity or a person. 22        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 23    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 24    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 25    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 26    the procedure.  SB1826- 21 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 2    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 3    Confidential Reporting Act. 4        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 5    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 6    Act. 7        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 8    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 9        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 10    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 11    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 12    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 13    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 14    Act.15        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 16    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 17        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 18    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 19        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 20    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 21    protected health information, including demographic 22    information, that may be contained within or extracted 23    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 24    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 25    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 26    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45   SB1826- 22 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 2    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 3    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 4    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 5    160.103. 6    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 7Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 8prior to disclosure under this Act. 9    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a 10public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 11agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 12behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 13governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 14Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 15for purposes of this Act. 16    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 17information or limit the availability of records to the 18public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 19in this Act. 20(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 21102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 221-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 23eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 24103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 258-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 26eff. 7-1-24.)   SB1826- 23 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 103-865)2    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 3    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 4record that contains information that is exempt from 5disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 6that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 7to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 8shall make the remaining information available for inspection 9and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 10be exempt from inspection and copying: 11        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 12    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 13    regulations implementing federal or State law. 14        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 15    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 16    or a court order. 17        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 18    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 19    specifically designed to provide information to one or 20    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 21    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 22        (c) Personal information contained within public 23    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 24    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 25    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the   SB1826- 24 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 2    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 3    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 4    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 5    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 6    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 7    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 8    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 9    privacy. 10        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 11    created in the course of administrative enforcement 12    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 13    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 14    extent that disclosure would: 15            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 16        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 17        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 18        agency that is the recipient of the request; 19            (ii) interfere with active administrative 20        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 21        that is the recipient of the request; 22            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 23        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 24        hearing; 25            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 26        confidential source, confidential information   SB1826- 25 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 2        who file complaints with or provide information to 3        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 4        penal agencies; except that the identities of 5        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 6        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 7        local government, except when disclosure would 8        interfere with an active criminal investigation 9        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the 10        request; 11            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 12        techniques other than those generally used and known 13        or disclose internal documents of correctional 14        agencies related to detection, observation, or 15        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 16        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 17        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 18        request; 19            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 20        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 21            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 22        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 23        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 24    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 25    record management system if the law enforcement agency 26    that is the recipient of the request did not create the   SB1826- 26 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    record, did not participate in or have a role in any of the 2    events which are the subject of the record, and only has 3    access to the record through the shared electronic record 4    management system. 5        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 6    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police 7    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 8    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 9    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 10    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 11    Board. 12        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 13    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 14    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 15        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 16    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 17        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 18    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 19    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 20    materials are available in the library of the correctional 21    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 22    confined. 23        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 24    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 25    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 26    materials include records from staff members' personnel   SB1826- 27 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 2    information. 3        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 4    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 5    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 6    through an administrative request to the Department of 7    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 8    Mental Health. 9        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 10    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 11    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 12    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 13    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 14    institution or facility.15        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 16    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 17    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 18    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 19    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 20    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 21    or school address, work telephone number, social security 22    number, or any other identifying information, except as 23    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 24    or claim. 25        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 26    requested by a person committed to the Department of   SB1826- 28 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 2    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 3    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 4    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 5    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 6    claim. 7        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 8    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 9    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 10    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 11    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 12    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 13    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 14    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 15    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents 16    and to all those records of the judicial body and its 17    components that pertain to the preparation of judicial 18    opinions and orders or judicial work product. 19        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 20    information obtained from a person or business where the 21    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 22    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 23    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 24    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 25    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 26    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records   SB1826- 29 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    requested.2        The information included under this exemption includes 3    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 4    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 5    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 6    company within the investment portfolio of a private 7    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 8    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 9    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply 10    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 11    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 12    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 13    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 14    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 15    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 16    privately held company may cause competitive harm.17        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 18    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 19    to disclosure. 20        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 21    agreement, including information which if it were 22    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 23    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 24    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 25    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 26    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an   SB1826- 30 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    award or final selection is made. 2        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 3    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 4    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 5    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 6    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 7    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 8    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 9    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only 10    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 11    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 12    legal rights of the general public. 13        (j) The following information pertaining to 14    educational matters:15            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 16        examination data used to administer an academic 17        examination; 18            (ii) information received by a primary or 19        secondary school, college, or university under its 20        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 21        their academic peers; 22            (iii) information concerning a school or 23        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 24        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 25        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and26            (iv) course materials or research materials used   SB1826- 31 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1        by faculty members. 2        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 3    submissions, and other construction related technical 4    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 5    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 6    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 7    including, but not limited to, power generating and 8    distribution stations and other transmission and 9    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities, 10    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 11    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 12    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 13    security. 14        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 15    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 16    public body makes the minutes available to the public 17    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 18        (m) Communications between a public body and an 19    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 20    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 21    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 22    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 23    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 24    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 25    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 26        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication   SB1826- 32 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 2    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 3    cases in which discipline is imposed. 4        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 5    with automated data processing operations, including, but 6    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 7    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 8    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 9    pertaining to all logical and physical design of 10    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 11    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 12    security of the system or its data or the security of 13    materials exempt under this Section. 14        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 15    between public bodies and their employees or 16    representatives, except that any final contract or 17    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 18        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 19    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 20    an applicant for a license or employment. 21        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 22    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 23    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 24    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 25    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 26    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and   SB1826- 33 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 2    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 3    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 4    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 5    until a sale is consummated. 6        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 7    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 8    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 9    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool. 10    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 11    intergovernmental risk management association or 12    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 13    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 14        (t) Information contained in or related to 15    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 16    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 17    for the regulation or supervision of financial 18    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 19    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 20    law. 21        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 22    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 23    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 24    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 25    Electronic Transactions Act. 26        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and   SB1826- 34 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 2    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 3    community's population or systems, facilities, or 4    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 5    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 6    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 7    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 8    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 9    include such things as details pertaining to the 10    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 11    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 12    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 13        (w) (Blank). 14        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 15    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 16    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 17    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 18    Illinois Power Agency. 19        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 20    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 21    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 22    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 23    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 24    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 25    Commission. 26        (z) Information about students exempted from   SB1826- 35 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 2    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 3    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 4    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 5    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 6        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 7    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 8        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 9    review team and records maintained by a mortality review 10    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 11    Mortality Review Team Act. 12        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 13    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 14    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 15    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.16        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 17    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 18    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 19    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 20        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 21    information of persons who are minors and are also 22    participants and registrants in programs of park 23    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 24    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 25    associations.26        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal   SB1826- 36 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    information of participants and registrants in programs of 2    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 3    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 4    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 5    minors.6        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 7    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 8    2012. 9        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of 10    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 11    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 12    School Code and any information contained in that report. 13        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 14    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 15    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 16    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 17    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 18    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 19    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 20    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 21    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 22    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 23    Corrections.24        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 25    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 26        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card   SB1826- 37 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 2    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 3    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 4    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 5    of a governmental entity or a person. 6        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 7    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 8    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 9    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in 10    the procedure.11        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 12    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 13    Confidential Reporting Act. 14        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 15    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 16    Act. 17        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 18    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 19        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 20    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 21    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 22    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 23    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 24    Act.25        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 26    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act.   SB1826- 38 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 2    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 3        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 4    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 5    protected health information, including demographic 6    information, that may be contained within or extracted 7    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 8    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 9    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance 10    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 11    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 12    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 13    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 14    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 15    160.103. 16        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 17    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 18    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 19    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 20        (uu) Records that are privileged or confidential under 21    the Illinois Code of Judicial Conduct or the Illinois 22    Rules of Professional Conduct. 23    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 24Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 25prior to disclosure under this Act. 26    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a   SB1826- 39 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 2agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 3behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 4governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 5Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 6for purposes of this Act. 7    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 8information or limit the availability of records to the 9public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 10in this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 131-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 14eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 15103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 168-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 17eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    (5 ILCS 140/9.5)19    Sec. 9.5. Public Access Counselor; opinions.20    (a) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 21record is denied by a public body, except the General Assembly 22and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof and the 23judicial body and its components, may file a request for 24review with the Public Access Counselor established in the 25Office of the Attorney General not later than 60 days after the   SB1826- 40 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1date of the final denial. The request for review must be in 2writing, signed by the requester, and include (i) a copy of the 3request for access to records and (ii) any responses from the 4public body.5    (b) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 6record is made for a commercial purpose as defined in 7subsection (c-10) of Section 2 of this Act may not file a 8request for review with the Public Access Counselor. A person 9whose request to inspect or copy a public record was treated by 10the public body as a request for a commercial purpose under 11Section 3.1 of this Act may file a request for review with the 12Public Access Counselor for the limited purpose of reviewing 13whether the public body properly determined that the request 14was made for a commercial purpose. 15    (b-5) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 16record was treated by a public body, except the General 17Assembly and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof and 18the judicial body and its components, as a voluminous request 19under Section 3.6 of this Act may file a request for review 20with the Public Access Counselor for the purpose of reviewing 21whether the public body properly determined that the request 22was a voluminous request. 23    (c) Upon receipt of a request for review, the Public 24Access Counselor shall determine whether further action is 25warranted. If the Public Access Counselor determines that the 26alleged violation is unfounded, he or she shall so advise the   SB1826- 41 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1requester and the public body and no further action shall be 2undertaken. In all other cases, the Public Access Counselor 3shall forward a copy of the request for review to the public 4body within 7 business days after receipt and shall specify 5the records or other documents that the public body shall 6furnish to facilitate the review. Within 7 business days after 7receipt of the request for review, the public body shall 8provide copies of records requested and shall otherwise fully 9cooperate with the Public Access Counselor. If a public body 10fails to furnish specified records pursuant to this Section, 11or if otherwise necessary, the Attorney General may issue a 12subpoena to any person or public body having knowledge of or 13records pertaining to a request for review of a denial of 14access to records under the Act. Records or documents obtained 15by the Public Access Counselor from a public body for the 16purpose of addressing a request for review under this Section 17may not be disclosed to the public, including the requester, 18by the Public Access Counselor. These records, while in the 19possession of the Public Access Counselor, are exempt under 20this Act from disclosure by the Public Access Counselor.21    (d) Within 7 business days after it receives a copy of a 22request for review and request for production of records from 23the Public Access Counselor, the public body may, but is not 24required to, answer the allegations of the request for review. 25The answer may take the form of a letter, brief, or memorandum. 26The Public Access Counselor shall forward a copy of the answer   SB1826- 42 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1to the person submitting the request for review, with any 2alleged confidential information to which the request pertains 3redacted from the copy. The requester may, but is not required 4to, respond in writing to the answer within 7 business days and 5shall provide a copy of the response to the public body.6    (e) In addition to the request for review, and the answer 7and the response thereto, if any, a requester or a public body 8may furnish affidavits or records concerning any matter 9germane to the review.10    (f) Unless the Public Access Counselor extends the time by 11no more than 30 business days by sending written notice to the 12requester and the public body that includes a statement of the 13reasons for the extension in the notice, or decides to address 14the matter without the issuance of a binding opinion, the 15Attorney General shall examine the issues and the records, 16shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall 17issue to the requester and the public body an opinion in 18response to the request for review within 60 days after its 19receipt. The opinion shall be binding upon both the requester 20and the public body, subject to administrative review under 21Section 11.5.22    In responding to any request under this Section 9.5, the 23Attorney General may exercise his or her discretion and choose 24to resolve a request for review by mediation or by a means 25other than the issuance of a binding opinion. The decision not 26to issue a binding opinion shall not be reviewable.  SB1826- 43 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1    Upon receipt of a binding opinion concluding that a 2violation of this Act has occurred, the public body shall 3either take necessary action immediately to comply with the 4directive of the opinion or shall initiate administrative 5review under Section 11.5. If the opinion concludes that no 6violation of the Act has occurred, the requester may initiate 7administrative review under Section 11.5.8    A public body that discloses records in accordance with an 9opinion of the Attorney General is immune from all liabilities 10by reason thereof and shall not be liable for penalties under 11this Act. 12    (g) If the requester files suit under Section 11 with 13respect to the same denial that is the subject of a pending 14request for review, the requester shall notify the Public 15Access Counselor, and the Public Access Counselor shall take 16no further action with respect to the request for review and 17shall so notify the public body.18    (h) The Attorney General may also issue advisory opinions 19to public bodies regarding compliance with this Act. A review 20may be initiated upon receipt of a written request from the 21head of the public body or its attorney, which shall contain 22sufficient accurate facts from which a determination can be 23made. The Public Access Counselor may request additional 24information from the public body in order to assist in the 25review. A public body that relies in good faith on an advisory 26opinion of the Attorney General in responding to a request is   SB1826- 44 -LRB104 02962 LNS 12978 b1not liable for penalties under this Act, so long as the facts 2upon which the opinion is based have been fully and fairly 3disclosed to the Public Access Counselor. 4(Source: P.A. 103-69, eff. 1-1-24.) 5    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 6changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 7that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 8represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 9not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 10made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 11Public Act.